Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2392.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-51-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-51 entitled "School Bus
Safety Enforcement" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-51-2. Live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems.
(a) All school departments of this state are hereby authorized to install and operate:
(1) live Live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems. Such systems
shall, at a minimum, be systems which monitor and detect school bus traffic violations. For
purposes of this chapter a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system means
a system with one or more camera sensors and computers which produce live digital and recorded
video of motor vehicles being operated in violation of school bus traffic laws in violation of § 31-
20-12. All systems installed for use under this chapter shall, at a minimum, produce a live visual
image viewable remotely, a recorded image of the license plate, and be able to record the time,
date, and location of the vehicle, and a signed affidavit by a person who witnessed the violation via
live video.
(2) The GPS (global positioning system) data regarding the real time location and velocity
of the bus or other motor vehicle used to transport students to and from schools shall be made
available electronically to the department, as well as to authorized parents or guardians of students
who are being transported by such bus or other motor vehicle.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, all new school buses to be operated pursuant to § 31-20-

11(a) shall be equipped with a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system
that conforms with the requirements of subsection (a)(1) of this section, and the GPS requirements
of subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(c) On and after July 1, 2032, all school buses to be operated pursuant to § 31-20-11(a)
shall be equipped with a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system that
conforms with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(d) The school departments with input and approval by the municipal police chief may
enter into an agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide live digital video school
bus violation detection monitoring systems and to maintain and operate such systems.
(e) No information that is otherwise required to be reported or be made available
electronically pursuant to this section shall be reported or be made available electronically in a
manner that would violate any applicable provision of federal, state or local law related to the
privacy of information, interfere with an active law enforcement investigation, or otherwise result
in the disclosure of information exempt from public disclosure pursuant to applicable federal, state,
or local law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004470/SUB A
========
LC004470/SUB A - Page 2 of 3